Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 3. Child Support
§ 20-2-307.
Presumptive child support to be followed; deviations by court.

The presumptive child support established by W.S.

20-2-304

shall be rebuttably presumed to be the correct amount of child support to be awarded in any proceeding to establish or modify temporary or permanent child support amounts. Every order or decree providing for the support of a child shall set forth the presumptive child support amount and shall state whether the order or decree departs from that amount.

A court may deviate from the presumptive child support established by W.S.

20-2-304

upon a specific finding that the application of the presumptive child support would be unjust or inappropriate in that particular case. In any case where the court has deviated from the presumptive child support, the reasons therefor shall be specifically set forth fully in the order or decree. In determining whether to deviate from the presumptive child support established by W.S.

20-2-304

, the court shall consider the following factors:

The age of the child;

The cost of necessary child day care;

Any special health care and educational needs of the child;

The responsibility of either parent for the support of other children, whether court ordered or otherwise;

The value of services contributed by either parent;

Any expenses reasonably related to the mother’s pregnancy and confinement for that child, if the parents were never married or if the parents were divorced prior to the birth of the child;

The cost of transportation of the child to and from visitation;

The ability of either or both parents to furnish health, dental and vision insurance through employment benefits;

The amount of time the child spends with each parent;

Any other necessary expenses for the benefit of the child;

Whether either parent is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed. In such case the child support shall be computed based upon the potential earning capacity (imputed income) of the unemployed or underemployed parent. In making that determination the court shall consider:

Prior employment experience and history;

Educational level and whether additional education would make the parent more self-sufficient or significantly increase the parent’s income;

The presence of children of the marriage in the parent’s home and its impact on the earnings of that parent;

Availability of employment for which the parent is qualified;

Prevailing wage rates in the local area;

Special skills or training; and

Whether the parent is realistically able to earn imputed income.

Whether or not either parent has violated any provision of the divorce decree, including visitation provisions, if deemed relevant by the court; and

Other factors deemed relevant by the court.

If the parties fail to agree that the presumptive child support amount under W.S.

20-2-304

is appropriate, the court may order the party seeking to deviate from the presumptive child support amount to pay reasonable attorney fees and court costs to the other party unless, after hearing the evidence and considering the factors contained in subsection (b) of this section, the court deviates from the presumptive support amount.

Agreements regarding child support may be submitted to the court. All such agreements shall be accompanied by a financial affidavit as required by W.S.

20-2-308

. The court shall use the presumed child support amounts to review the adequacy of child support agreements negotiated by the parties. If the agreed amount departs from the presumed child support, the parties shall furnish statements of explanation which shall be included with the forms and shall be filed with the court. The court shall review the agreement and inform the parties whether or not additional or corrected information is needed, or that the agreement is approved or disapproved. No agreement which is less than the presumed child support amount shall be approved if means tested sources of income such as aid under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program, health care benefits under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, supplemental nutrition assistance program, supplemental security income (SSI) or other similar benefits are being paid on behalf of any of the children.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 225, § 1; Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 2; Laws 1993, ch. 184, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-302

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program” for “food stamps” near the end of (d).

Deviation from the guidelines. —

District court did not abuse its discretion when it did not allow a downward deviation from a father’s presumptive child support because the father failed to establish that the father contributed substantially to the expenses of the children of the father and the mother. Marquis v. Marquis, 2020 WY 141, 476 P.3d 212,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2020).

2016 child support order did not deviate from the presumptive amount of support, as the district court did not make any specific findings required for deviation. The heightened requirement for modification of a child support order was, therefore, inapplicable and the mother’s showing of a 20 percent change in support justified the district court’s modification of the father’s child support obligation. Brown v. Brown, 2021 WY 26, 480 P.3d 524,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2021).

Factors supported deviation. —

District court did not exceed the bounds of reason when it found a father was not voluntarily underemployed on the basis that he earned less money at his new job than he made while operating a lawn care business because the father closed a business for various reasons, testifying that his new job allowed him to fully exercise visitation with his children; the business was failing, and the father could not independently revive a failing business and parent his four children as a single father. Edwards v. Edwards, 2020 WY 35, 459 P.3d 448,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2020).

Deviation from the guidelines. —

It was not an abuse of discretion not to order retroactive child support because the district court (1) identified presumptive support, (2) recognized the court could order a downward deviation for another child’s support and retroactive support, and (3) reasonably compromised by ordering neither. Shipley v. Smith, 2020 WY 26, 458 P.3d 852,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 2

6 (Wyo. 2020);

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(February 25, 2020).

Imputation of income not supported by record. —

It was not an abuse of discretion not to impute a father’s prior income because (1) the court heard relevant evidence, and (2) the father explained why the father took a lower-paying job. Shipley v. Smith, 2020 WY 26, 458 P.3d 852,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 2

6 (Wyo. 2020);

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(February 25, 2020).

Consideration of factors for deviation required. —

Remand on the issue of deviation from child support was necessary because the record included no evidence of the cost of insurance, and the district court did not consider the mother’s financial obligations to her other child, the cost of transporting the child to and from visitation, even though its order required extensive travel. Martin v. Hart, 2018 WY 123, 429 P.3d 56,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2018).

Support to be calculated under the guidelines. —

In the parties' divorce, the trial court erred in calculating the child support for the parties' adult disabled daughter because it failed to follow the statutory procedure, which required that such support be calculated under the guidelines. Bagley v. Bagley, 2013 WY 126, 311 P.3d 141,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2013).

Presumptive amount properly ordered. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in ordering a mother to pay the presumptive child support amount as calculated with the guidelines because the district court specifically stated that it was ordering the mother to pay the presumptive child support amount as calculated with the guidelines. Brush v. Davis, 2013 WY 161, 315 P.3d 648,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2013).

District court properly denied a father’s motion for relief from an income withholding order because his motion requested that his child support obligation be vacated, he presented no argument that the order, itself, was improper or that Wyoming’s statutory approach to setting child support included an irrebuttable presumption, and did not present a record that would enable review of his claim, the court’s findings—which considered the needs of the children and the timing of the father’s release from prison—did not support an argument that the court applied an irrebuttable presumption, and it was arguable that the statute at issue created a rebuttable presumption of $50 per month minimum child support when read in conjunction with another section. MSC, II v. MCG, 2019 WY 59, 442 P.3d 662,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2019).

A deviation from the guidelines. —

District court’s order sufficiently indicated the reason for its departure from the presumptive child support amount because the order clearly provided that the downward deviation from presumptive child support was based on the father’s responsibility for the support of a later-born child from a subsequent marriage; The district court’s decision clearly indicates that applying the presumptive child support guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate. TSR v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2017 WY 144, 406 P.3d 729,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2017).

Pre-statutory child support agreements not necessarily changed. —

Child support agreements made prior to the enactment of the statutory child support guidelines do not necessarily have to be changed simply because of the enactment of the statutory guidelines. Roberts v. Roberts, 816 P.2d 1293,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1991).

But original agreement weighed against statutory factors. —

In making its determination as to whether to deviate from the child support guidelines, the court may consider the list of factors under this section and the parties' original agreement and weigh their relevance. Roberts v. Roberts, 816 P.2d 1293,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1991).

Marriage document impermissibly attempted to limit court's authority to set support payments

to 10% of the non-custodial parent's annual income; while Wyoming permits the parties to submit child support agreements to the court, the legislature requires court approval or rejection of any plan. Combs v. Sherry-Combs, 865 P.2d 50,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1993).

Children from later marriage relevant to support determination. —

In a child support modification suit brought on behalf of a child from the noncustodial parent's first marriage, the court was correct when it held that the children born to the petitioner's later marriage should not be factored into the child support guidelines matrix set forth in former § 20-6-304(a) (now see

20-2-304

). However, the court erred when it concluded that it had to strictly apply the guidelines and could not take into consideration the parent's later-born minor children for purposes of determining the modification award, as the court may consider responsibility for later born children pursuant to subsection (b)(iv) of this section. Hasty v. Hasty, 828 P.2d 94,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1992).

District court
properly modified child support because it did not abuse its discretion
in deviating from the presumptive child support amount; once the
district
determined that deviation was appropriate based on the
father’s
obligation to a later-born child from his subsequent
marriage, nothing
prevented it from calculating the appropriate
support obligation
by
considering the presumptive amount for all
of the father’s
children.
TSR v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2017 WY 144, 406 P.3d 729,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2017).

Rebuttable presumption that modification is warranted created. —

Rather than requiring courts to modify existing support awards, former § 20-6-306(a) (now see

20-2-311

), in conjunction with former §§ 20-6-304(a) (now

20-2-304

) and this section, created a rebuttable presumption that modification would be warranted when application of the guidelines would result in a 20% change in the monthly support award; this rebuttable presumption applies not only when child support is initially awarded, but also when a support award is modified. Pauling v. Pauling, 837 P.2d 1073,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1992); Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Change from shared to primary custody created rebuttable presumption that modification warranted. —

In a child support action, a district court erred by failing to modify child support in a proceeding commenced after a change from shared custody to primary custody with the mother. Pursuant to the presumptive child support guidelines, the father should have been required to pay 20 percent more than he had been required to pay under the previous order. McCulloh v. Drake, 2005 WY 18, 105 P.3d 1091,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2005).

Denial of visitation rights not change in circumstances. —

The denial of visitation rights by either the custodial parent or the child does not constitute a change in circumstances justifying the reduction or termination of the noncustodial parent's support obligation. A child's need for support and a parent's ability to pay are not related to questions concerning visitation. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Lack of visitation and negative feelings not to be considered. —

Lack of visitation and negative feelings between a noncustodial parent and child are not proper factors that a court may consider in determining whether to deviate from the presumptive support guidelines; such consideration is, therefore, an abuse of discretion. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

District court abused its discretion when it determined that the magnitude of the negative feelings and the extent of the alienation that had occurred between a father and his adult son warranted a downward deviation of half the presumptive child support under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

20-2-304

and 20-2-307(a).
Steele v. Neeman, 2009 WY 58, 206 P.3d 384,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2009).

A deviation from the guidelines

is permitted only when the trial court makes a finding that it would be unjust or inappropriate to follow them in a particular case and it specifically sets forth in full the reasons therefor in the divorce decree. Raymond v. Raymond, 956 P.2d 329,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1998).

Deviation from presumptive child support obligation is allowed when district court finds that it would be unjust or inappropriate to apply the presumptive support obligation. Wood v. Wood, 964 P.2d 1259,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1998).

Slight deviation from guidelines permissible. —

A court's deviation of $25.81 less than that provided by the support guidelines of former §

20-6-304

(now

20-2-304

) was permissible, despite the lack of written or specific findings on the record to account for the deviation, as required by subsection (b). Dowdy v. Dowdy, 864 P.2d 439,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1993).

Deviation if consideration of social security dependency benefits results in unjust amount. —

Treating social security benefits paid to dependent children as earnings of the contributing parent allows for a just calculation of child support and thus social security benefits should be considered when making a presumptive child support determination. However, a district court may deviate from the presumptive child support amount should the calculations result in an unjust or inappropriate amount of support under the circumstances. Groenstein v. Groenstein, 2005 WY 6, 104 P.3d 765,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2005).

Factors supported deviation. —

Defendant father's choice to reside in an economically depressed area where work in his former profession, at which he earned up to $50,000 a year, was not available, his decision not to exercise his right to overnight visitation with his daughter and therefore his not incurring meal and other additional expenses he would incur if she were staying at his home, one son's hearing disability, which required additional expenses for hearing aids and batteries, and the mother's provision of cash assistance to the oldest son in college, fell within the factors listed in this section which justified deviation from the presumptive child support level. Ready v. Ready, 2003 WY 121, 76 P.3d 836,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2003).

In a child support case, a district court did not abuse its discretion by ordering a father to pay less than the statutory presumptive amount because he had necessary child day care costs, the father had the children for a substantial period of time, and he paid his share of uncovered medical expenses. However, the father did not have the children overnight for 40 percent of the time. Dellit v. Tracy, 2015 WY 153, 362 P.3d 353,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2015).

Order directing a father to pay a mother $680 per month in child support was proper because the joint custody child support provision did not apply as the father's contribution was not substantial and he was, instead, entitled to a downward deviation under the statute from the presumptive child support amount for his additional contribution. Lee v. Lee, 2013 WY 76, 303 P.3d 1128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2013).

Because it was within the trial court's discretion to deviate from its presumptive child support determinations, it did so on the basis of one of the statutorily defined factors in this section, the mother's support of another child in addition to three at issue, and it made a specific finding relevant to that factor in its decision letter, there was no abuse of discretion. Windham v. Windham, 2015 WY 61, 348 P.3d 836,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2015).

Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-307(b)(xi), the evidence supported a finding that the father was realistically able to earn the higher income and that he was voluntarily underemployed, which justified deviation from the child support guidelines; the district court adequately indicated that the reason for the decision was that the father was voluntarily underemployed, one of the reasons specifically listed in the statute.
Opitz v. Opitz, 2007 WY 207, 173 P.3d 405,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 2007).

Insurance and travel costs. —

Downward deviation of $25.00 per month in father's child support obligation was appropriate in consideration of father's insurance and travel costs. KC v. KJM (In re IC), 971 P.2d 603,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1999).

Deviation allowed for substantial cost of transportation and visitation. —

In a divorce action, a district court was not required to examine all of the factors in this section before deviating from the presumptive child support amount to account for the non-custodial parent's cost of transportation to and from visitation. Durham v. Durham, 2003 WY 95, 74 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2003).

Factors supported deviation. —

Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-307(b)(xi), the evidence supported a finding that the father was realistically able to earn the higher income and that he was voluntarily underemployed, which justified deviation from the child support guidelines; the district court adequately indicated that the reason for the decision was that the father was voluntarily underemployed, one of the reasons specifically listed in the statute.
Opitz v. Opitz, 2007 WY 207, 173 P.3d 405,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 2007).

Downward deviation for travel costs. —

In a divorce action, a district court was not required to examine all of the factors in this section before deviating from the presumptive child support amount to account for a non-custodial parent's cost of transportation to and from visitation. Durham v. Durham, 2003 WY 95, 74 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2003).

Alimony as child support. —

There was no evidence in the record that in stipulation in a divorce decree the parents intended for alimony payments to be transformed into child support. Pasenelli v. Pasenelli, 2002 WY 159, 57 P.3d 324,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2002).

Material circumstantial change warrants modification of agreement. —

When the amount of child support is set by agreement, the party seeking modification must demonstrate a material change in circumstances other than a 20 percent departure from the statutory guidelines. Smith v. Smith, 895 P.2d 37,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1995).

No modification of support justified. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in finding no material change of circumstances justifying modification of child support where parent refused to pay support from severance pay or assets after termination of employment and had not attempted to find a job conforming to her physical restrictions, and the medical condition that she claimed was a change in circumstances existed at the time of the divorce. Murphy v. Holman, 945 P.2d 1193,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1997).

Previously divided assets. —

Contemplation of previously divided assets a second time, as income for purposes of post-decree child support adjustment is inequitable and violative of the rule announced in Klatt v. Klatt, 654 P.2d 733,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1982).Bollig v. Bollig, 919 P.2d 136,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1996).

District court incorrectly considered the father's receipt of previously divided marital property as income. Bollig v. Bollig, 919 P.2d 136,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1996).

Title XIX benefits. —

District court cannot simply sign off on a stipulated decree deviating from the guidelines when Title XIX Medicaid benefits are being paid for the benefit of children; however, a court is not precluded from ordering a deviation downward from the presumed child support amount after making appropriate findings if a party has any of the means-tested sources of income referred to. District court may use its discretion and consider whether a deviation is appropriate, even when means tested sources of income are being paid on behalf of any of the children; this interpretation is consistent with other child support statutes. Dellit v. Tracy, 2015 WY 153, 362 P.3d 353,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2015).

Terms of divorce decree. —

Trial court did not err in ordering child support to end when the child became 18 and in having deviated from the presumptive support level; although the parties were not aware of their son's learning disability at the time that the divorce decree, that decree stated support would end once each child reached the age of 18, and the mother had forgiven the child support arrearage owed to her by the father. Shelhamer v. Shelhamer, 2006 WY 83, 138 P.3d 665,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2006).

Child support order could not stand because there was no evidence in the record supporting the $ 1,160 income imputed to the mother; rather than calculating child support under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-307(d) using the $ 1,025 net monthly income imputed to the mother in the parties'
divorce decree, the trial court imputed a net monthly income of $ 1,160 to the mother.
Roemmich v. Roemmich, 2010 WY 115, 238 P.3d 89,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2010).

District court could properly consider incarcerated father's retirement assets

in determining whether or not a deviation from presumptive child support was justified, although large deviation on basis of this factor alone was not warranted. Wood v. Wood, 964 P.2d 1259,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1998).

Uncertain historical gifts excluded from “income.” —

The court is afforded discretion to include or not include historical gifts as a source of income and may rule that gifts to a spouse were so uncertain as to preclude their inclusion in a calculation of monthly income. Triggs v. Triggs, 920 P.2d 653,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Committing a crime not voluntarily underemployed. —

Father was not voluntarily underemployed because he voluntarily committed a crime which limited his employment options; legislature did not contemplate voluntarily committing a crime when it enacted this section, and evidence revealed that father made a good faith effort to find the highest paying job possible given his situation. Wood v. Wood, 964 P.2d 1259,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1998).

Imputation of income supported by record. —

In determining the mother's income for child support purposes, the trial court did not err in failing to impute more than $ 1,400 per month to the mother based on her voluntary underemployment. The only job out of the three part-time jobs she held where the mother could increase her hours of work paid $ 10 per hour, and although the mother had significant educational training in both finance and fashion design, there was no testimony that those jobs were available in Jackson. Groenstein v. Groenstein, 2005 WY 6, 104 P.3d 765,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2005).

Imputation of income not supported by record. —

The record did not support the district court's decision to impute an annual $ 35,000 income to a mother for the purpose of computing child support, where the record (1) included evidence of the mother's employment history and income level, but (2) did not include any evidence regarding the availability of employment or the local wage rates in the pertinent area. Durham v. Durham, 2003 WY 95, 74 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2003).

Trial court's award of child support was proper because it took into consideration the statutory factors, how the fact that the children were still living in the mother's home impacted her ability to work, and that the father did not show that deviation was appropriate. Stevens v. Stevens, 2014 WY 23, 318 P.3d 802,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2014).

Failure to comply with statutory requirements. —

Child support order was erroneous because the order did not set forth the presumptive child support amount, as required by the statute; hence, it was necessary to remand the case to the district court. JKS v. AHF (In re ARF), 2013 WY 97, 307 P.3d 852,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2013).

Although the district court was privy to information regarding the husband’s finances that would allow it to reach a decision about child support, and the husband’s failure to file a financial affidavit did not render the stipulated decree problematic with respect to child support, the fact that the district court did not acknowledge the presumptive child support amount did; further, the order originally establishing the amount of child support could not be relied upon as that order also failed to state the presumptive amount, and it did not give any indication as to how the court reached the $2,500 per month calculation. Long v. Long, 2018 WY 26, 413 P.3d 117,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2018).

Applied

in

Morehead v. Morehead, 811 P.2d 721,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Smith v. Smith, 863 P.2d 624,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1993);
Cranston v. Cranston, 879 P.2d 345,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1994); Barrett-Oliver v. Quast, 2013 WY 71, 302 P.3d 909,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Jun 6, 2013).

Cited

in

Underkofler v. Underkofler, 834 P.2d 1140,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1992);
Madison v. Madison, 859 P.2d 1276,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1993);
Fountain v. Mitros, 968 P.2d 934,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1998);
Noonan v. Noonan, 2005 WY 145, 122 P.3d 964,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(2005); Davidson v. Carrillo, 2014 WY 65,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(May 22, 2014); Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2014 WY 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Dec. 17, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Child Support and Social Security Dependent Benefits: a Comprehensive Analysis and Proposal for Wyoming,” see 2 Wyo. L. Rev. 39 (2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of child support guidelines to cases of joint, split, or similar shared custody arrangements, 57 ALR5th 389.

Basis for imputing income for purpose of determining child support where obligor spouse is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, 76 ALR5th 191.

§ 20-2-308.
Financial affidavits required; financial reporting.

No order establishing or modifying a child support obligation shall be entered unless financial affidavits on a form approved by the Wyoming supreme court which fully discloses the financial status of the parties have been filed, or the court has held a hearing and testimony has been received.

Financial affidavits of the parties shall be supported with documentation of both current and past earnings. Suitable documentation of current earnings includes but is not limited to pay stubs, employer statements, or receipts and expenses if self-employed. Documentation of current earnings shall be supplemented with copies of the most recent tax return to provide verification of earnings over a longer period.

The court may require, or the parents may agree, to exchange financial and other appropriate information once a year or less often, by regular mail, for the purpose of analyzing the propriety of modification of court ordered child support.

All financial affidavits and records required by law to be attached to the affidavit shall constitute a confidential file and are subject to inspection by persons other than the parties, their attorneys or the department of family services to the extent necessary to enforce the Child Support Enforcement Act and the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act only by court order.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2003, ch. 155, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Child Support Enforcement Act, see chapter 6 of this title. For the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see chapter 4 of this title.

Financial affidavit.—

Mother’s testimony was consistent with her confidential financial affidavit (CFA), which had sufficient required supporting documentation, and the district court did not abuse its discretion in relying on the CFA to calculate her monthly income; mother’s updated CFA listed her hourly rate at $ 13.50 and her weekly hours at approximately 27 hours, which was consistent with her testimony, and father’s bald assertion that her testimony reflected a much higher income was not supported by the record. Bruce v. Bruce, 2021 WY 38, 482 P.3d 328,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2021).

Mother did attach multiple current pay stubs, her 2017 W-2, and her 2017 and 2018 tax returns to her confidential financial affidavit in satisfaction of the statute, and there was no offer of proof whereby the father could show that the mother’s 2018 W-2 would have changed the court’s calculations; there was no statutory violation or abuse of discretion that would require the district court’s calculation to be overturned. Bruce v. Bruce, 2021 WY 38, 482 P.3d 328,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2021).

Evidentiary hearing.—

District court had sufficient evidence to arrive at a clear understanding of a father’s income without a hearing and did not abuse its discretion when it relied on the parties’ submissions to calculate the father’s income and child support. The district court had sufficient information to calculate the father’s income, and both the mother and the father presented memoranda and arguments regarding child support and attached financial affidavits, income tax returns, and other supporting documentation. Marquis v. Marquis, 2020 WY 141, 476 P.3d 212,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2020).

Insufficient financial evidence.—

Remand to a district court for additional proceedings to determine a father’s income was necessary because the district court abused its discretion under in ordering child support as the district court did not have sufficient information about the father’s finances to calculate child support, potentially misinterpreted the evidence before it, and ignored its statutory obligation to obtain that information before entering a child support order. Lemus v. Martinez, 2019 WY 52, 441 P.3d 831,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2019).

Timing.

This section
contains no timing requirements relating to the filing of a financial
affidavit; therefore, a father did not prevail in his argument relating
to a mother's financial affidavit because the mother filed a signed
and notarized affidavit before a trial court entered its support order,
and the father was not prejudiced in any manner by the delayed filing. Davidson v. Carrillo, 2014 WY 65, 325 P.3d 444,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2014).

Financial affidavit. —

District court did not abuse its discretion by using a mother's affidavit of indigency, which showed her gross income, because the mother disregarded its express order to provide a financial affidavit; the mother appeared at the default hearing, and the district court ordered her to submit a financial affidavit, which she did not do. Brush v. Davis, 2013 WY 161, 315 P.3d 648,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2013).

It was not an abuse of discretion to order a father to pay child support when the father had not filed a required financial affidavit because (1) the court had sufficient other evidence of the parties' finances, and (2) the father could not complain on appeal of the father's disregard of statutory requirements. Peak v. Peak, 2016 WY 109, 383 P.3d 1084,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2016).

Although the district court was privy to information regarding the husband’s finances that would allow it to reach a decision about child support, and the husband’s failure to file a financial affidavit did not render the stipulated decree problematic with respect to child support, the fact that the district court did not acknowledge the presumptive child support amount did; further, the order originally establishing the amount of child support could not be relied upon as that order also failed to state the presumptive amount, and it did not give any indication as to how the court reached the $2,500 per month calculation. Long v. Long, 2018 WY 26, 413 P.3d 117,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2018).

Tax returns. —

It was not an abuse of discretion for the trial court, under this section, to use the most recent tax returns for determining income since defendant father's tax refund could be considered as affecting cash flow. Ready v. Ready, 2003 WY 121, 76 P.3d 836,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2003).

Transcripts. —

District court had to ensure that proceedings to establish paternity were reported, so that a transcript of those proceedings would be available in the event of an appeal; there must be a record suitable for the purpose of meaningful review on appeal. JAG v. State, 2002 WY 158, 56 P.3d 1016,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2002).

Insufficient financial evidence. —

Motion to set aside the default divorce decree should have been granted under W.R.C.P. 60(b) because the trial court failed to base its findings of fact in accordance with W.R.C.P. 55(b)(2) regarding property distribution, child custody, visitation, and support on some evidence in the record, and the trial court did not comply with the dictates of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-308(a) by obtaining sufficient financial evidence of both parties' income to make factual determinations, to comply with the presumptive child support guidelines found in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-304

, or to determine whether to deviate from those guidelines under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-307

. Noonan v. Noonan, 2005 WY 145, 122 P.3d 964,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2005).

Child support order could not stand under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-308(a) because there was no evidence in the record supporting the $ 1,160 income imputed to the mother, nor was there any explanation for the order requiring her to pay $ 279 per month, as opposed to an earlier calculation of $ 239 per month; the mother did not file a financial affidavit nor did she testify concerning her income.
Roemmich v. Roemmich, 2010 WY 115, 238 P.3d 89,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited in

Dellit v. Tracy, 2015 WY 153,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Dec. 4, 2015).